Washington statutes.
RCW 1.04.016

Expansion of numbering system—Decimal factor.

It is the intent that under said numbering system the section factor of the section number shall be treated as a decimal figure, and where new sections must hereafter in codifying be inserted between sections then already consecutively numbered, the proper number for such new section shall be created by the insertion of an additional digit at the terminal end of the number of the section immediately preceding the location at which such new section is to be inserted.

[ 1951 c 5 s 5.]